bhojpuri.dix
    <pardef n="राति/__n_f_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="औरत/__n_f_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भास/ा__n_f_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गुड़िय/ा__n_f_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नइ</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सक्ति/__n_f_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ऋतु__n_f_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बह/ू__n_f_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुए</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुने</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुए</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुने</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लौ/__n_f_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="माँ/__n_f_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="d" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भोर/े__n_f_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>े<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="राति">
      <i>राति</i>
      <par n="राति/__n_f_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="भोर">
      <i>भोर</i>
      <par n="भोर/े__n_f_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="माँ">
      <i>माँ</i>
      <par n="माँ/__n_f_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="लौ">
      <i>लौ</i>
      <par n="लौ/__n_f_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="बह">
      <i>बह</i>
      <par n="बह/ू__n_f_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ऋतु">
      <i>ऋतु</i>
      <par n="ऋतु__n_f_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="सक्ति">
      <i>सक्ति</i>
      <par n="सक्ति/__n_f_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="गुड़िय">
      <i>गुड़िय</i>
      <par n="गुड़िय/ा__n_f_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="भास">
      <i>भास</i>
      <par n="भास/ा__n_f_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="औरत">
      <i>औरत</i>
      <par n="औरत/__n_f_eo" />
    </e>
